Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1059YH (2) 91 cm/jh H.F. 256 Section 1. Section 614.1, subsection 9, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , those founded on 3 injuries to the person or wrongful death against any physician 4 and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, dentist, 5 podiatric physician, optometrist, pharmacist, chiropractor, 6 physician assistant, or nurse, licensed under chapter 147 , or a 7 hospital licensed under chapter 135B , arising out of patient 8 care, within two years after the date on which the claimant 9 knew, or through the use of reasonable diligence should have 10 known, or received notice in writing of the existence of, the 11 injury or death for which damages are sought in the action, 12 whichever of the dates occurs first , but . However, in no event 13 shall any action be brought more than six years after the date 14 on which occurred the act or omission or occurrence alleged in 15 the action to have been the cause of the injury or death unless 16 a any of the following are true: 17 (1) A foreign object unintentionally left in the body caused 18 the injury or death. 19 (2) The licensee or the licenseeâs staff concealed from the 20 person the act, omission, or occurrence that was the cause of 21 the injury or death. 22